Illinois, session 104th, HB4879.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Children and Family Services Act is amended 5by adding Section 5c-1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 505/5c-1 new)7    Sec. 5c-1. Child welfare employee transparency portal.8    (a) Findings. The General Assembly finds the following: 9        (1) Families have the right to know who is entering 10    their home and making decisions regarding child safety.11        (2) The Department of Children and Family Services and 12    purchase of service (POS) agencies that contract with the 13    Department employ individuals whose licensure and 14    qualifications are not easily verified.15        (3) A public, searchable database increases 16    accountability, prevents misuse of titles, and helps 17    ensure only properly certified child welfare workers 18    investigate cases.19        (4) The purpose of this Section is to require full 20    transparency of child welfare employee identity, 21    credentials, Child Welfare Employee License (CWEL) status, 22    and disciplinary actions.23    (b) Definitions. As used in this Section:   HB4879- 2 -LRB104 18901 KTG 32346 b1    "Authorized to conduct child welfare investigations" means 2an individual who holds an active Child Welfare Employee 3License and meets the applicable requirements and 4qualifications for certification under subsection (d) of 5Section 21 of this Act and under the Child Protective 6Investigator and Child Welfare Specialist Certification Act of 71987, and who is assigned by the Department to perform child 8welfare investigations. 9    "Certification and qualification" means the education, 10training, experience, and competency requirements applicable 11to child welfare functions in accordance with the Child 12Protective Investigator and Child Welfare Specialist 13Certification Act of 1987, as determined by existing law and 14rule. 15    "Licensure" means an active Child Welfare Employee License 16issued in accordance with Section 5c of this Act. 17    (c) Public transparency portal. 18        (1) The Department shall maintain a public, searchable 19    online portal that lists every individual who:20            (A) holds a Child Welfare Employee License (CWEL);21            (B) performs investigations, casework, or 22        supervisory functions; and23            (C) is employed by the Department or a POS agency 24        that contracts with the Department. 25        (2) The portal shall include the following information 26    on each child welfare employee listed:  HB4879- 3 -LRB104 18901 KTG 32346 b1            (A) full legal name;2            (B) official job title;3            (C) employer agency;4            (D) child welfare employee license number and date 5        of issuance;6            (E) child welfare employee license status (active, 7        inactive, suspended, or revoked); 8            (F) certification and qualification status (met or 9        not met) in accordance with requirements under 10        subsection (d) of Section 21 of this Act and the Child 11        Protective Investigator and Child Welfare Specialist 12        Certification Act of 1987; 13            (G) an indication of whether the individual is 14        authorized to conduct child welfare investigations, 15        based on licensure and certification status; 16            (H) employment status (active or suspended);17            (I) any disciplinary actions taken under the Child 18        Protective Investigator and Child Welfare Specialist 19        Certification Act of 1987; and20            (J) the last date upon which the child welfare 21        employee submitted to a criminal history background 22        check.23        (3) The portal shall be updated within 48 hours of any 24    change in a child welfare employee's licensing, 25    disciplinary, or employment status.26    (d) Prohibited assignments. The Department and POS   HB4879- 4 -LRB104 18901 KTG 32346 b1agencies that contract with the Department may not assign 2investigative or casework duties to any child welfare employee 3who: 4        (1) is not listed on the portal;5        (2) has a suspended or expired CWEL; or6        (3) has been disciplined or disqualified under 7    subsection (e) or under the Child Protective Investigator 8    and Child Welfare Specialist Certification Act of 1987.9    (e) Penalties. POS agencies that contract with the 10Department that knowingly assign investigation or casework 11duties to unlicensed or unlisted individuals shall be subject 12to mandatory corrective action. 13    (f) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to alter, 14expand, or limit existing licensure, certification, training, 15experience, or assignment requirements under State law.  16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 171, 2027.